test/src/gt-norm-yamls/A-ashshw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Adjective - aššõ: # adjectives 120 'eng /est äkiline/fin' - full paradigm
     aššõ+A+Sg+Nom: aššõ
     aššõ+A+Sg+Gen: aššõ
     aššõ+A+Sg+Par: aššõ
     aššõ+A+Sg+Dat: aššõn
     aššõ+A+Sg+Ins: aššõks
     aššõ+A+Sg+Ill: [aššõz, aššõ]
     aššõ+A+Sg+Ela: aššõst
     aššõ+A+Pl+Nom: aššõd
     aššõ+A+Pl+Gen: aššõd
     aššõ+A+Pl+Par: aššidi
     aššõ+A+Pl+Dat: aššõdõn
     aššõ+A+Pl+Ins: aššõdõks
     aššõ+A+Pl+Ill: aššiz
     aššõ+A+Pl+Ela: aššist
